Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Chapter 13 Ad Valorem Taxation

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 100, § 1, creates a task force for the study of property tax classifications for industrial and commercial property and their relation to the communication industry and provides requirements.

Cross references. —

As to assessment of lands and improvements thereon, see art. 15, § 1, Wyo. Const.

As to assessment of coal lands for taxation, see art. 15, § 2, Wyo. Const.

As to required uniformity of assessment, see art. 15, § 11, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

70C Am. Jur. 2d Special or Local Assessments, § 1 et seq; 71 Am. Jur. 2d State and Local Taxation §§ 130 to 157.

Method of calculating value of stock of goods or the like for purposes of tangible personal property tax, 66 ALR2d 833.

Domicile for state tax purposes of wife living apart from husband, 82 ALR3d 1274.

Situs of tangible personal property for purposes of property taxation, 2 ALR4th 432.

84 C.J.S. Taxation §§ 79 to 260.

§ 39-13-101.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Ad valorem” means according to value;

“Ad valorem tax” means a property tax based on the assessed value of the property;

“Agricultural land,” as used in W.S. 39-13-103(b)(x), means land which meets the requirements of W.S. 39-13-103(b)(x) for the purpose of tax assessment;

“Deed” means a conveyance of real property, in writing signed by the grantor, whereby the interest held by the grantor to real property is transferred from one to another;

“Tax deed” means the conveyance given upon a sale of real property for nonpayment of ad valorem taxes;

“Telecommunications companies” means and includes any person engaged in the furnishing of telecommunications service;

“Telecommunications service” means the offering of transmission for hire of telecommunications between or among points specified by the user, of information of the user’s choosing without change in the content of the information as sent and received by means of telecommunications facilities, including switching facilities, using wire, cable, microwave, radio wave, light wave or a combination of those or similar media. The term shall include all types of telecommunications transmission such as telephone service, telegraph service, cellular, wireless or satellite. The term shall not include assets used for television or radio programming broadcast over airwaves for public consumption, cable or satellite television offered for public consumption or telephone answering service and one-way paging or beeper service;

“Agricultural purpose,” as used in W.S. 39-13-103(b)(x), means the following land uses when conducted consistent with the land’s capability to produce or when supporting the land’s capability to produce:

Cultivation of the soil for production of crops; or

Production of timber products or grasses for forage; or

Rearing, feeding, grazing or management of livestock; or

Land used for a farmstead structure.

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities;

“Land used for a farmstead structure” means land that underlies and that supports the use of a barn, shop, shed, granary, corral or other structure if the structure:

Is used to support an agricultural purpose specified in subparagraphs (viii)(A) through (C) of this subsection;

Is not a structure built for human habitation or actually used for human habitation;

Is not attached to a structure built for human habitation or actually used for human habitation; and

Is built upon land used for the agricultural purpose supported by the structure.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 59, § 1; 2001, ch. 206, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 92, § 1; 2016 ch. 77, § 1, effective January 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 142, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2016 amendment,

effective January 1, 2017, added (a)(ix).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in the introductory language of (a)(viii), inserted “or when supporting the land’s capability to produce; added (a)(viii)(D), and made a related change; and added (a)(x).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
193.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 39-13-102.
Administration; confidentiality.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 26, § 2.

The board of county commissioners of each county constitutes the county board of equalization. The county board shall meet at the office of the county commissioners at such times as necessary to perform its statutory duties, but no earlier than the fourth Tuesday in April to consider current year assessments. The county clerk shall act as clerk of the county board. The county assessor or his designee shall attend all meetings to explain or defend the assessments. The county board of equalization shall:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 26, § 2.

Approve any corrected assessment or any valuation change contained in the assessment roll;

Hear and determine the complaint of any person relative to any property assessment or value as returned by the county assessor subject to W.S. 39-13-109(b)(i). The county board of equalization may request that a case be certified directly to the state board of equalization as provided in W.S.

39-11-102

.1(c). If the case involves property that may subject the county to tax liability, the county board of equalization shall certify the case directly to the state board of equalization and the board of county commissioners shall have standing to appeal any decision made by the state board of equalization regarding the property;

Decide all protests heard and provide the protestant with a written decision no later than October 1.

The county board of equalization has no power to and shall not set tax policy nor engage in any administrative duties concerning assessments which are delegated to the board, the department or the county assessor.

Not later than June 1, the county assessor shall make an abstract of the assessment roll containing the quantity and value of each class of property assessed for taxation and transmit the abstract to the board and provide a copy to the county board of equalization. The board shall immediately forward copies of the abstracts to the department and ask for any recommendations.

Any person whose property assessment has been increased by an equalization order shall be notified of the increase by the county assessor. Any person wishing to review an assessment of his property may contact the county assessor.

On or before the first Monday of August, the board of county commissioners shall by order entered of record levy the requisite taxes for the year. On or before the third Monday in August the county assessor shall compute the taxes from the corrected valuations as corrected by the state board and entered by the county assessor in the column of corrected valuations. The county assessor shall deliver the tax list and his warrant for the collection of the taxes to the county treasurer setting forth the assessment roll, with the taxes extended, containing in tabular form and alphabetical order the names of persons in whose names property has been listed in the county, with the classes of property and the value, total amount of taxes and column of numbers and values and total taxes footed commanding the treasurer to collect the taxes. At the end of the tax list and warrant, the county assessor shall prorate the total taxes levied to the several funds.

The county treasurer upon receiving the tax list and warrant shall immediately proceed to collect the taxes levied for the current year and taxes remaining unpaid from preceding years.

The county assessor may authorize changes in the assessment roll or tax list at any time to correct errors in the name of a person taxed or to enter omitted property and its assessed value.

On or before September 1, county assessors shall certify the exemptions granted pursuant to W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xxiv) to the department. On or before October 1 the state treasurer out of funds appropriated for that purpose shall reimburse each county treasurer for the amount of taxes which would have been collected if the property was not exempt. The county treasurer shall distribute the revenue to each governmental entity in the actual amount of taxes lost due to the exemption.

The department shall annually value and assess the following property at its fair market value for taxation:

The gross product of all mines and mining claims;

Property of pipeline companies;

Property of electric utilities;

Property of railroad companies;

Property of rail car companies;

Property of telecommunications companies;

Property of other public utilities;

Leased property consisting of warehouses, storage facilities and office structures and any other property that is in support of or which is used or held for use for the activities listed in this subsection. If leased property is assessed to the lessee it shall not be assessed to the property owner;

Property of cable or satellite television companies;

Property of airline companies used for the public transportation of passengers or property for hire.

Following determination of the fair market value of property the department shall notify the taxpayer by mail or, if offered by the department and upon request of the taxpayer, by electronic transmission of the assessed value. The person assessed may file written objections to the assessment with the board within thirty (30) days of the date of postmark or the date of electronic transmission, whichever is earlier, and appear before the board at a time specified by the board. For purposes of this subsection, if a written objection is mailed or sent by electronic transmission by the person assessed, it shall be deemed timely filed if it is postmarked or transmitted not later than thirty (30) days after the mailing or electronic transmission of the notification of the assessed value. The person assessed shall also file a copy of the written objections with the county treasurer of the county in which the property is located, who shall notify the county assessor and the board of county commissioners, with an estimate of the tax amount under appeal based upon the previous year’s tax levy.

Annually, on or before the dates hereafter indicated, or as soon thereafter as the fair market value is determined, the department shall certify the valuation determined by the department to the county assessor of the county in which the property is located, to be entered upon the assessment rolls of the county:

June 1, mines and mining claims, pipeline companies, electric utilities and other public utilities;

First Monday in June, telephone and telegraph companies;

First Monday in July, railroad companies.

Any governmental entity with authority to levy or require the levy of property taxes which is formed or organized or which changes its geographical boundaries shall cause one (1) copy of the legal description which is contained within the document authorizing formation or modification of boundaries and one (1) copy of an official map designating the geographical boundaries as formed or changed to be filed with the department and with the county clerk and county assessor in the county or counties within which the entity is located within ten (10) days after the effective date of the formation, and annually, by a date determined by the department, if the governmental entity levies or requires the levy of taxes and has changes to its geographical boundaries by annexation, enlargement, merger, consolidation, exclusion or dissolution. Failure to file the required documents within the required time relieves the county assessor and the department from responsibility of modifying the assessment roll to reflect the property in the new entity or changed boundary area.

Confidentiality. The following shall apply:

All taxpayer returns and return information shall be confidential and, except as authorized below, no current or former official, officer, employee or agent of the state of Wyoming or any political subdivision thereof shall disclose any such information obtained by him in connection with his service as an officer or employee. As used in this subsection, “taxpayer returns and return information” shall include, but not be limited to, all statements, reports, summaries and all other data and documents under audit or provided by the taxpayer in accordance with law;

Without written authorization from the taxpayer, no current or former official, officer, employee or agent of the state of Wyoming or any political subdivision thereof shall release taxpayer returns and return information pertaining to taxes imposed by this chapter, except:

Information filed with the department may be released to the governor or his designee, members of the state board of equalization, to the commissioners and employees of the public service commission, to employees of the department of audit, the department of revenue, the consensus revenue estimating group and to the attorney general. Information filed with the county assessor may be released to the county board of equalization, the department of revenue and the department of audit;

Upon prior notice to the taxpayer, information filed with the department may be released by the department, upon written application, to any other governmental entity if the governmental entity shows sufficient reason to obtain the information for official business;

Information concerning taxpayer’s valuation and assessment shall be made available on a confidential basis to the county board of equalization and the state board of equalization when the information is pertinent to an appeal before either board;

Any other use authorized by law;

An itemized list of the taxpayer’s taxable tangible personal property provided to the assessor pursuant to W.S. 39-13-107(a)(i) may be disclosed to a new owner of property that is the subject of the taxpayer’s returns or return information upon a transfer of that taxable tangible personal property to the new owner.

Any person receiving information pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this subsection shall sign an agreement with the department to keep the information confidential;

The taxable value of the taxpayer’s property is not confidential and may be released without qualification;

Any person who negligently violates the provisions of this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00). Any person who intentionally violates the provisions of this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), but not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) and imprisoned for not more than one (1) year.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 122, § 1; 2001, ch. 206, § 1; 2003, ch. 27, § 1; ch. 202, § 1; 2005, ch. 108, § 2; 2007, ch. 4, § 1; 2008, ch. 22, § 1; 2014 ch. 106, § 1, effective January 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 21, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2016 ch. 77, § 1, effective January 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 25, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 26, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 44, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 147, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to county assessors generally, see §

18-3-201

et seq.

The 2005 amendment

, in (p) substituted “levy or require the levy of” for “levy,” substituted “governmental entity” for “special district,” and inserted “annexation.”

Laws 2005, ch. 108, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

The 2007 amendment,

effective January 1, 2008, added (m)(ix).

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “the governmental entity levies or requires the levy of taxes and” for “a governmental entity” in (p).

The 2014 amendment,

effective January 1, 2015,
in (c)(v), substituted “October 1” for “the first
Monday in August”; and in (f), deleted “The county assessor
shall notify” at the beginning of the first sentence, inserted
“shall be notified,” added “by the county assessor”
at the end; and added the last sentence.

The 2015 amendment

added (m)(x).

Laws 2015, ch. 21, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2016 amendment,

effective January 1, 2017, in (n), inserted “or, if offered by the department and upon request of the taxpayer, by electronic transmission” in the first sentence and “or the date of electronic transmission, whichever is earlier” in the second sentence.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 25, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (c)(iv) added the second sentence.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (c)(iii) rewrote the section text, which formerly read: “Correct any assessment or valuation contained in and complete the assessment roll”; in (e) deleted the beginning of the first sentence, which formerly read: “Immediately after the assessment roll is corrected by the county board of equalization and,” at the end of the first sentence added “and provide a copy to the county board of equalization”, and deleted the end of the last sentence, which formerly read: “with respect to equalization of values”; in (f) in the first sentence, substituted “an equalization order” for “the county board of equalization”, in the last sentence substituted “may” for “shall”, and deleted “not later than thirty (30) days after the date of the assessment schedule”; and made related changes.

The third
2017 amendment, by ch. 26, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, repealed former (a), (b), and (c)(i) and (c)(ii).

While no amendment gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 44, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, added (q)(ii)(E).

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 147, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (c)(iv) added the last sentence.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added the third sentence in (n).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

Purpose of act. —

Laws 2005, ch. 108, § 3, provides: “It is the intent of this act to develop an accurate and comprehensive database of the property within each governmental entity in the state with the power to levy or to require the levy of property taxes within that governmental entity. Regardless of the date of formation, each governmental entity in the state with the power to levy or to require the levy of ad valorem taxes shall file a map or legal description designating the current geographical boundaries of the governmental entity with the department of revenue, the county assessor and the county clerk in the county or counties within which the entity is located in accordance with the department's rules regarding tax districts. Not later than August 1, 2005, the department shall notify each governmental entity subject to the provisions of this section of the entity's most recent filing with the department and whether that filing meets the requirements of this act. If a governmental entity subject to the provisions of this act has not met the requirements of this act, or if its most recent filing with the department is no longer accurate, it shall file not later than November 1, 2005 a map or other legal description of its current boundaries in accordance with this act and the department's rules on taxing districts. Thereafter, filings shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

Task force. —

Laws 2005, ch. 64, § 1, creates the intangible property task force to study the taxation of intangible property for property taxation purposes. The task force is to consist of seven members. The task force is to: (1) address the benefits and costs and the related policy implication of taxing or not taxing intangible property; (2) determine the historic taxation or exemption of intangible property in all of the ad valorem tax classes and the impact of recent Wyoming Supreme Court decisions relating to the taxation or exemption of intangible property in all of the ad valorem tax classes and consider any proposals for changes; (3) determine what intangibles, if any, are to be exempt from taxation; (4) study the composition of the current ad valorem tax classification of industrial and commercial properties, and any proposals for changes; (5) study the department's methodology for assessment and valuation for state assessed properties, and any proposals for changes; and (6) determine any impacts that methodologies for valuation and assessment of property may have on competition and on uniformity and any proposals for changes. The task force is to report its findings, including any recommendations for statutory changes, to the governor and the joint revenue interim committee not later than December 15, 2005.

Laws 2005, ch. 64, § 2, appropriates $50,000, or so much thereof as is necessary, from the general fund to the legislative service office for the purposes of the act.

Laws 2005, ch. 64, § 3, makes the act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.

Local assessments. —

Statute which required auditor to furnish board of equalization list for assessment of railroad and telegraph property, and required board to value and assess such property, withdrew duty of assessing fractional parts of companies' property from local assessors. Union P. R. Co. v. Cheyenne, 113 U.S. 516, 5 S. Ct. 601, 28 L. Ed. 1098, 1885 U.S. LEXIS 1700 (U.S. 1885) (decided under prior law).

Cellular companies subject to assessment as telephone companies. —

Cellular companies are subject to state tax assessment as telephone companies; the similarity in function between the service provided by wireline or traditional telephone companies and cellular companies indicates that they both provide telephone service. Airtouch Communs., Inc. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2003 WY 114, 76 P.3d 342,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. Oct. 7, 2003).

Discretion of department. —

The weight to be given factors in the unit system or to items otherwise to be valued in arriving at valuation of the whole is a matter exclusively within the discretion of the board (now department), and when that discretion is exercised without impropriety, the district court could not, and the supreme court will not, disturb it. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R. v. Bruch, 400 P.2d 494,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1965).

Refusal to accept returns not proof of failure to consider them. —

That the board (now department) would not accept returns or statements either in the amounts shown therein or in their bearing upon the ultimate valuation established for tax purposes is not proof that they were not considered. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R. v. Bruch, 400 P.2d 494,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1965).

Overvaluation by state tax officials resulting from error of judgment

will not support claim of discrimination, but there must be something equivalent to fraudulent purpose or intent to disregard fundamental principle of uniformity before collection of part of tax will be enjoined. Rowley v. Chicago & N. R. Co., 293 U.S. 102, 55 S. Ct. 55, 79 L. Ed. 222, 1934 U.S. LEXIS 8 (U.S.), reh'g denied, 293 U.S. 632, 55 S. Ct. 211, 79 L. Ed. 717, 1934 U.S. LEXIS 441 (U.S. 1934).

Opportunity to object. —

Levy of tax before owner of property has had an opportunity to object to the assessment is invalid. Hecht v. Boughton, 2 Wyo. 385,

1881 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1881), writ of error dismissed, 105 U.S. 235, 26 L. Ed. 1018, 1881 U.S. LEXIS 2110 (U.S. 1882).

Included within type of hearing contemplated under prior similar section were

the right to notice, the right to cross-examine witnesses, the right to appear with counsel and the right to a written statement containing the board's (now department's) findings of fact and conclusions of law. Wyoming Bd. of Equalization v. State, 637 P.2d 248,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1981).

Protest not required within 30 days. —

The procedure articulated in this section is designed to permit the taxpayer to challenge an erroneous assessment prior to paying the tax and is useful only when the taxpayer has information at its disposal to demonstrate error. It is impossible for a taxpayer to protest a tax at a time when it has no knowledge nor is it chargeable with knowledge that the amount of the tax is erroneous. Amoco Prod. Co. v. Board of Comm'rs, 876 P.2d 989,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1994).

Interest assessed from date tax delinquent. —

When a taxpayer undervalues its oil and gas gross production, the underpaid ad valorem tax is delinquent on the date it should have been paid, not on the later date of notification and demand. Assessing interest only from the date of notification and demand would permit the taxpayer to undervalue gross production without risk of penalty and would allow the taxpayer the free use of the unpaid tax dollars. Kunard v. Enron Oil & Gas Co., 869 P.2d 132,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1994).

Equipment necessary for marketable product production. —

Although §

35-11-1103

exempts pollution control devices from taxation, there is no evidence of an intent by the legislature to exempt equipment which is necessary to produce a marketable final product, even if that final product pollutes less when consumed by an end-user and even if environmental regulations require the modification to the final product. Laramie County Bd. of Equalization v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 915 P.2d 1184,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1996).

Requirements of valuation. —

While there may be different valuations for different property, the method or system used must lead to a fair value, and the properties must be assessed at a uniform rate. Hillard v. Big Horn Coal Co., 549 P.2d 293,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1976).

“Market value” defined. —

The “market value” is not cost but the price which would be paid upon a sale between a willing seller and a willing buyer. C F & I Steel Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 492 P.2d 529,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1972).

Where property has no market value, value must be ascertained as nearly as possible

by considering facts which would have weight between persons bargaining for the property. C F & I Steel Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 492 P.2d 529,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1972).

Cost-of-production technique recognized method of appraisal. —

While the supreme court has not considered directly a cost-of-production technique as a recognized method of appraisal it does appear to be an acceptable method of determining fair market value where there is no sale of personal property. Appeal of Monolith Portland Midwest Co., 574 P.2d 757,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1978).

But hypothetical costs cannot be included. —

In pursuing a cost-of-production technique for appraisal of the value of the product of a mine, the department of revenue and taxation and the board of equalization cannot include hypothetical costs. Appeal of Monolith Portland Midwest Co., 574 P.2d 757,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1978).

Only actual costs may be utilized

in the formula when a cost-appraisal technique is applied for purposes of fixing the value according to this section. Appeal of Monolith Portland Midwest Co., 574 P.2d 757,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1978).

All factors related to value are to be considered,

and this requirement must be limited in terms of time. Hillard v. Big Horn Coal Co., 549 P.2d 293,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1976).

Element of profit. —

One of the facts which would have weight as to the seller would be an element of profit. C F & I Steel Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 492 P.2d 529,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1972).

The value of personal property includes the usual and reasonable profit to a mine operator. C F & I Steel Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 492 P.2d 529,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1972); Hillard v. Big Horn Coal Co., 549 P.2d 293,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1976).

Section clear and unambiguous in context of severance and ad valorem taxes. —

The statutory language of this section is clear and unambiguous; the terms are not vague or uncertain and they are not subject to various meanings in the context of a severance and ad valorem tax statute such as this section. Chevron U.S.A. v. State, 918 P.2d 980,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1996), reh'g denied,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. July 16, 1996).

Factor of cost. —

Cost is one of several factors which may be shown as an aid and guide to the court's evaluation of the proof of market value. C F & I Steel Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 492 P.2d 529,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1972).

Name of owner required. —

Requirement that assessment roll shall specify name of individual or corporation to whom property shall be taxable means owner. Electrolytic Copper Co. v. Rambler Consol. Mines Corp., 34 Wyo. 304, 243 P. 126,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1926), overruled, Goodrich v. Stobbe, 908 P.2d 416,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1995).

Assessment and tax sale of mining claims were void where property was not assessed in the name of the record owner. Tibbals v. Board of County Comm'rs, 74 Wyo. 232, 286 P.2d 598,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1955).

Tax sale may be void for want of sufficient description of property.

Electrolytic Copper Co. v. Rambler Consol. Mines Corp., 34 Wyo. 304, 243 P. 126,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1926), overruled, Goodrich v. Stobbe, 908 P.2d 416,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1995).

Who may assess. —

Assessor must make assessment and where he fails to make it, county clerk and county commissioners who afterwards made it, acted without authority of law and tax could not be collected. Union Pac. R.R. v. Donnellan, 2 Wyo. 478,

1882 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1882).

Completion of assessment roll. —

County assessment roll is not to be sent to state board of equalization until county board has completed all adjustments at its July meeting, and the roll is not complete or final, so as to authorize tax levy, until acted upon by state board. Baker v. Paxton, 29 Wyo. 500, 215 P. 257,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1923).

Correcting assessment roll. —

This section does not require the board to hear evidence, as a condition precedent to correcting the assessment roll, but it may act on the personal knowledge of its members, or on information gained by them from any source at their command. Ricketts v. Crewdson, 13 Wyo. 284, 79 P. 1042,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 13 Wyo. 284, 79 P. 1042,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1905).

Reassessment protested in first statutorily provided occasion. —

A reassessment amount may be protested by the taxpayer, before the county and state board, on the first statutorily provided occasion available after the reassessment has occurred, even if during the next year, after the protest period has passed. In re Appeal of Paradise Valley Country Club, 748 P.2d 298,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1988).

Protest notice, signed by officer of corporation rather than attorney, is proper.

In re Appeal of Paradise Valley Country Club, 748 P.2d 298,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1988).

With regard to sufficiency of execution of tax protest petition,

“under oath” will not be differentiated from “acknowledgement” before a notary public, unless objection is taken by the governmental agency in order to afford an opportunity for reexecution by the complaining taxpayer. In re Appeal of Paradise Valley Country Club, 748 P.2d 298,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1988).

Revision by court of overassessment. —

A mere excessive assessment and over-valuation of property within the county by the board cannot be revised by the courts in the absence of a showing that the action of the board was fraudulent. Ricketts v. Crewdson, 13 Wyo. 284, 79 P. 1042,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 13 Wyo. 284, 79 P. 1042,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1905).

Presumption of equalization. —

It must be presumed that when county assessment roll is laid before state board of equalization, valuations of various owners have been fully equalized as between themselves. Bunten v. Rock Springs Grazing Ass'n, 29 Wyo. 461, 215 P. 244,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1923).

Standing of county assessor. —

County assessor lacked standing to appeal State Board of Equalization's decision to district court as county officers are not persons within definition given in § 39-1-101(a)(xiii) (now see § 39-11-101(a)(xiii)). Brandt v. TCI Cablevision, 873 P.2d 595,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1994).

Different assessment bases for electric utilities unconstitutional. —

There was no rational basis for treating non-profit electric utilities differently from investor-owned utilities for purposes of ad valorem taxation, and therefore valuation of rural electric cooperative's property constituted an abuse of discretion and was unconstitutional. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. Department of Revenue, 970 P.2d 841,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1999).

Different assessment bases for country clubs illegal. —

A county assessor's reassessment use of a commercial square-footage appraisal for a golf grounds, as compared to an agricultural land basis for the comparable properties of another country club, was illegal. In re Appeal of Paradise Valley Country Club, 748 P.2d 298,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1988).

Applied

in

Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Exxon Mobil Corp. 2002 WY 151, 55 P.3d 714,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 2002).

Quoted

in

Paradise Valley Country Club v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 748 P.2d 298,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1988); AT & T Communications of Mt. States, Inc. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 768 P.2d 580,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1989); Black v. Teton County Bd. of County Comm'rs, 775 P.2d 484,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1989); Amax Coal W., Inc. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 896 P.2d 1329,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Platte County Sch. Dist. No. 1 v. Basin Elec. Power Coop., 638 P.2d 1276,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1982); Amax Coal Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 819 P.2d 825,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1991); Wyoming State Tax Comm'n v. BHP Petro. Co., 856 P.2d 428,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1993); Ross v. State, 930 P.2d 965,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1996); Laramie County Bd. of Equalization v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 915 P.2d 1184,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1996); Amoco Prod. Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 7 P.3d 900,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2000).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

For article, “Remedies for Defects in General Property Tax Assessments in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 240.

For comment, “Defects in Assessment and Levy as Affecting Validity of Tax Title,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 262.

For note, “Mineral Taxation—When is a Refund of Ad Valorem Mineral Taxes Appropriate?,” see XXX Land & Water L. Rev. 129 (1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Who is “aggrieved” within statutes providing remedies in tax cases, 53 ALR2d 892.

Situs of aircraft, rolling stock, and vessels for purposes of property taxation, 3 ALR4th 837.

Standing of one taxpayer to complain of underassessment or nonassessment of property of another for state and local taxation, 9 ALR4th 428.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
193.03 (Matthew Bender).